Utah statutes.
31A-22-516.   Payment of benefits.

Any sum which is due because of the death of the person insured is payable to the beneficiary designated by the insured person, unless the policy contains conditions providing that the beneficiary is a family member designated by the policy terms.  The insurer may reserve in the policy the right, if there is no designated beneficiary living at the death of the person insured as to all or any part of the sum, to pay a part of the sum not exceeding $5,000 to any person appearing to the insurer to be equitably entitled to that money by reason of having incurred expense for the maintenance, medical attention, or burial of the insured or for other reasons.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

